Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.114, is amended to read: 124D.114 new text begin FLUID MILK; new text end LACTOSE REDUCED MILK. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Milk offerings. new text end new text begin A national school lunch program participant or school breakfast program participant must offer a variety of fluid milk. A school may offer options that include flavored and unflavored organic or nonorganic whole, reduced-fat, low-fat, and fat-free fluid milk and nondairy beverages that are nutritionally equivalent to fluid milk and meet the nutritional standards established by the United States Secretary of Agriculture. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Lactose-reduced milk. new text end (a) If a nonpublic school or district receives school lunch aid under section 124D.111 or participates in the school breakfast program and receives a written request from the parent of a pupil who is lactose intolerant, then the nonpublic school or district must make available lactose reduced milk; milk fortified with lactase in liquid, tablet, granular, or other form; or milk to which lactobacillus acidophilus has been added for the pupil. (b) Notwithstanding any law, local ordinance, or local regulation to the contrary, a school may pour or serve portions of any product required by this section from a large container of the product at the time and place the pupil is being served.